Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.220

Breakfast after the bell program—Guidelines and training. (Expires June 30, 2028.)

(1) Before January 2, 2019, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall develop and distribute procedures and guidelines for the implementation of RCW 28A.235.210 that comply with federal regulations governing the school breakfast program. The guidelines and procedures must include ways schools and districts can solicit and consider the input of families regarding implementation and continued operation of breakfast after the bell programs. The guidelines and procedures must also include recommendations and best practices for designing, implementing, and operating breakfast after the bell programs that are based upon the implementation and operational experiences of schools of differing sizes and in different geographic regions of the state that have implemented breakfast after the bell programs.

(2) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall offer training and technical and marketing assistance to all public schools and school districts related to offering breakfast after the bell, including assistance with various funding options available to high-needs schools such as the community eligibility provision under 42 U.S.C. Sec. 1759a(a)(1), programs under provision two of the national school lunch act, and claims for reimbursement under the school breakfast program.

(3) In accordance with this section, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall collaborate with nonprofit organizations knowledgeable about equity, the opportunity gap, hunger and food security issues, and best practices for improving student access to school breakfast. The office shall maintain a list of opportunities for philanthropic support of school breakfast programs and make the list available to schools interested in breakfast after the bell programs.

(4) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall incorporate the annual collection of information about breakfast after the bell delivery models into existing data systems and make the information publicly available.

[ 2018 c 8 s 4.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2018 c 8 ss 3, 4, and 6: See note following RCW 28A.235.210.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 8: See notes following RCW 28A.235.210.